Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-118
Banks; unlawful promotion; sale of stock prior to issuance of charter; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person for hire (a) to promote or attempt to promote the organization of a corporation to conduct the business of a bank in this state or (b) to sell the capital stock of such a corporation prior to the issuance of a charter to such corporation authorizing its operation as a bank.

(2) Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 13, p. 72;

R.S.1913, § 292;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 11, p. 689;

Laws 1921, c. 297, § 3, p. 950;

C.S.1922, § 7992;

Laws 1923, c. 192, § 1, p. 463;

C.S.1929, § 8-122;

Laws 1935, c. 19, § 1, p. 96;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-122;

Laws 1943, c. 19, § 3(4), p. 103;

R.S.1943, § 8-122;

Laws 1959, c. 15, § 6, p. 134;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-122;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 18, p. 141;

Laws 1967, c. 19, § 5, p. 119;

Laws 1973, LB 164, § 6;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 40;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 19.